Washington statutes.
RCW 44.28.818

Review of office of privacy and data protection. (Expires July 1, 2026.)

(1) The joint committee must conduct a program and fiscal review of the office of privacy and data protection created in RCW 43.105.369, by June 30, 2025, and report its findings to the legislature and the governor by December 1, 2025. The report must be prepared in the manner set forth in RCW 44.28.071 and 44.28.075.

(2) This section expires July 1, 2026.

[ 2016 c 195 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—2016 c 195: See note following RCW 43.105.369.